Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201819-5405
Vacant property registration ordinance; adoption by municipality.

Under the Vacant Property Registration Act, a municipality may adopt a vacant property registration ordinance which applies to any type of either residential or commercial buildings or both, located within the corporate limits of the municipality, except that a vacant property registration ordinance shall not apply to property owned by the federal government, the State of Nebraska, or any political subdivision thereof. A vacant property registration ordinance shall create a city-wide vacant property registration data base and clearly designate a program administrator.

Laws 2018, LB256, § 5.
July 19, 2018